North Dakota, session 69, HB1473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 43-15.3-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
a. For purposes of this subsection:
(1) "Contract pharmacy" means a pharmacy that has a contract with a covered entity to
receive and dispense drugs to the covered entity's patients on its behalf.
(2) "Covered entity" means an entity participating or authorized to participate in a
federal drug discount program under 42 U.S.C. 256b.
(3) "Drug" means a drug purchased under reduced pricing under section 340B of the
federal Public Health Service Act [42 U.S.C. 201 et seq.] by a covered entity.
b. Except as otherwise provided under section 43-15.3-09, it is a class B misdemeanor for a
manufacturer, an agent or affiliate of that manufacturer, virtual manufacturer, or third-
party logistics provider of a manufacturer's drugs, to:
(1) Directly or indirectly deny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere with the acquisition
of a drug by a contract pharmacy on behalf of a covered entity unless receipt of the
drug is prohibited by federal law.
(2) Prohibit a contract pharmacy from dispensing a drug by denying access to the drug.
(3) Require a covered entity or contract pharmacy to submit any claims, encounter, or
utilization data as a condition for acquiring or receiving a drug, unless the claims,
encounter, or utilization data sharing is required by federal law.
(4) Interfere with the ability of a covered entity or contract pharmacy to dispense a drug
to an eligible patient of the covered entity.
(5) Offer or otherwise make available a drug in the form of a rebate, unless in the form
of a discount at the time of sale and authorized under federal law.
c. This subsection does not apply to the limited distribution of a drug as required under
21 U.S.C. 355-1 .

H. B. NO. 1473 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1473.
House Vote: Yeas 71 Nays 17 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 4 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State